Idaho, session 2025, H0379.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 8, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 8
TRANSPARENCY IN TRAVEL BY STATE OFFICIALS
74-801. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to
promote public confidence in government and to promote transparency by re-
quiring candidates for statewide offices, statewide elected officials, and
officers-elect of statewide offices to report travel paid for by others.
74-802. REPORTING OF PAID TRAVEL -- PENALTY. (1) All state officials
shall report to the secretary of state all travel outside of Idaho reasonably
related to a governmental purpose or to an issue of state, national, or in-
ternational public policy paid for by another individual or entity. Travel
paid through campaign funds that are reported pursuant to chapter 66, title
67, Idaho Code, or solely through personal funds of a state official shall
not be subject to the requirements of this section. For the purposes of this
section, "state official" means a candidate for statewide office who will
appear on a general election ballot, a statewide elected official, and an of-
ficer-elect of any statewide office who has prevailed in a general election
but has not yet received the oath of office.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of the return date of any travel subject
to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a state official who is
subject to the reporting requirements provided for in subsection (1) of this
section shall file a report with the secretary of state that includes:
(a) The travel destination;
(b) The dates of travel;
(c) The purpose of the travel; and
(d) The name and address of the person or entity that paid for the
travel, including whether the travel was a campaign contribution and,
in the case of currently serving state officials, whether the travel was
made in such state official's capacity as a state official.
(3) Any state official who fails to file the report required pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section within thirty (30) days shall be subject


to a late fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each day until
the report is filed, which fee shall be deposited in the public school income
fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.